North Dakota statutes. TITLE 49 Public Utilities
CHAPTER 49-24 North Dakota Transmission Authority [Renumbered]

[Redesignated as chapter 17-05 under S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5]

Note.

This chapter has been redesignated as chapter 17-05 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 5.

49-24-01.
Declaration of findings and public purpose. [Renumbered]

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-01 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-02.
North Dakota transmission authority.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-02 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-03.
Definitions.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-03 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-04.
Purposes.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-04 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-05.
Powers.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-05 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-06.
Authority may act.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-06 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-07.
Authority may participate upon request.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-07 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-08.
Evidences of indebtedness.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-08 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-09.
Public service commission jurisdiction and consultation.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-09 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-10.
Bonds as legal investments.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-10 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-11.
Disposal of transmission facilities.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-11 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-12.
Exemption from property taxes.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-12 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-13.
Reporting requirements.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-13 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.

49-24-14.
Access to authority records — Confidentiality.

[Redesignated under S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.]

Note.

This section has been redesignated as section 17-05-14 pursuant to S.L. 2007, ch. 1462, § 5.